Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.575

Visits to elections offices, facilities.

The secretary of state, or any staff of the elections division of the office of secretary of state, may make unannounced on-site visits to county election offices and facilities to observe the handling, processing, counting, or tabulation of ballots.

[ 2004 c 266 s 1. Prior: 2003 c 109 s 1. Formerly RCW 29.04.075.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2004 c 266: "This act takes effect July 1, 2004." [ 2004 c 266 s 25.]